Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-4403
Behavior technician, defined.

Behavior technician means an individual who practices under the close, ongoing supervision of a licensed behavior analyst or a licensed assistant behavior analyst.

Laws 2023, LB227, § 3.